Utah statutes.
32B-10-403.   Specific application requirements for industrial or manufacturing use permit.

(1)  To obtain an industrial or manufacturing use permit, in addition to complying with Section 32B-10-202, a person shall submit to the department:

(a)  a floor plan of the immediate area within the premises in which the person proposes that an alcoholic product be used, mixed, stored, sold, offered for sale, furnished, or consumed; and

(b)  if the person is applying for an industrial or manufacturing use permit to produce gasohol or any alcoholic product, evidence that the person has:

(i)  an approved Notice of Registration of Distilled Spirits Plant; and

(ii)  the appropriate permit from the federal Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and Trade Bureau.

(2) (a)  The nonrefundable application fee for an industrial or manufacturing use permit is $75.

(b)  The one-time special use permit fee for an industrial or manufacturing use permit is $250.

(c)  The bond amount required for an industrial or manufacturing use permit is the penal sum of $1,000.



Amended by Chapter 334, 2011 General Session

